Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 3

Taxes and Fees

57-4-301. Privilege taxes — Tax on retail sales — Carrier license fees — Mixing bar tax.

It is hereby declared the legislative intent that every person is exercising a taxable privilege who engages in the business of selling at retail in this state alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises.

Each applicant for an on-premises consumption license shall pay to the commission a one-time, nonrefundable fee in the amount of three hundred dollars ($300) when the application is submitted for review. Further, once a license is approved, for the exercise of such privilege, the following taxes are levied to be earmarked for and allocated to the commission for the purpose of the administration and enforcement of the duties, powers, and functions of the commission, and are to be paid annually, as follows:

Effective July 2003 July 2004 (A) Private club $ 300 $ 500 (B) Convention center $ 500 $1000 (C) Premier type tourist resort $1500 $2000 (D) Historic performing arts center $ 300 $ 150 (E) Urban park center $ 500 $ 150 (F) Commercial passenger boat company $ 750 $1250 (G) Historic mansion house site/Historic inn $ 300 $ 150 (H) Historic interpretive center $ 300 $ 150 (I) Community theater $ 300 $ 150 (J) Zoological institution $ 300 $ 150 (K) Museum $ 300 $ 150 (L) Establishment in a terminal building of a commercial air carrier airport $1000 $1500 (M) Commercial airline travel club $ 500 $1000 (N) Public aquarium $ 300 $ 150 (O) Motor speedway $1000 $2000 (P) Sports facility $1000 $2000 (Q) Theater $ 300 $ 150 Further, for the exercise of such privilege, the following taxes are hereby levied to be earmarked for and allocated to the commission for the purpose of administration and enforcement of the duties, powers, and functions of the commission, and are to be paid in accordance with the following schedule: (R) Restaurant, according to seating capacity, on licensed premises: (i) 40 — 74 seats $ 650 (ii) 75 — 125 seats $ 750 (iii) 126 — 175 seats $ 925 (iv) 176 — 225 seats $ 975 (v) 226 — 275 seats $1100 (vi) 276 seats and more $1200 Wine-only restaurant, according to seating capacity on licensed premises: July 2003 July 2004 July 2005 July 2006 (vii) 40 — 125 seats $ 120 $ 170 $ 220 $ 270 (viii) 126 — 175 seats $ 150 $ 200 $ 250 $ 300 (ix) 176 — 225 seats $ 160 $ 210 $ 260 $ 310 (x) 226 — 275 seats $ 180 $ 230 $ 280 $ 330 (xi) 276 seats and more $ 200 $ 250 $ 300 $ 350 (S) Caterers: July 2003 July 2004 July 2005 July 2006 $ 500 $ 550 $ 575 $ 625 (T) Hotels, according to room capacity, on licensed premises: July 2003 July 2004 July 2005 July 2006 (i) 0 — 99 rooms $1000 $1000 $1000 $1000 (ii) 100 — 399 rooms $1000 $1000 $1200 $1250 (iii) 400 rooms and over $1000 $1200 $1400 $1500 (U) Retirement center $150 (V) Civic arts center $150 (W) Limited service restaurant, based on the gross sales of prepared food: (i) At least 30% of gross sales $2,000 (ii) At least 20% but not more than 30% of gross sales $3,000 (iii) At least 15% but not more than 20% of gross sales $4,000 (iv) 0% but not more than 15% of gross sales $5,000

Click to view table.

Each county or municipality within which such privilege is exercised is authorized to levy and collect the privilege tax separately. However, such privilege tax collected by the county or municipality will remain at the 2003 level and any monetary increase of the privilege tax in fiscal years beginning July 1, 2004, and thereafter, as provided in this subsection (b) will be solely used for the purpose of the administration and enforcement of the duties, powers, and functions of the Tennessee alcoholic beverage commission; provided, however, that in any county where metropolitan government prevails, the urban service district shall constitute the municipality and the general service district shall constitute the county insofar as this chapter is concerned.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(1)(E) to the contrary, “urban park centers” under § 57-4-102(39)(G)-(K) shall pay an annual privilege tax of four thousand dollars ($4,000) to be earmarked for and allocated to the commission for the purpose of administration and enforcement of the duties, powers, and functions of the commission.

In addition to the privilege taxes levied in subdivision (b)(1), there is further levied a tax equal to the rate of fifteen percent (15%) of the sales price of all alcoholic beverages sold for consumption on the premises, the tax to be computed on the gross sales of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises for the purpose of remitting the tax due the state, and to include each and every retail thereof.

A person required by subdivision (c)(1) to collect and pay the tax on the sale of alcoholic beverages on the premises may include the tax in the menu price of the alcoholic beverage or may include the tax on the final bill to the customer. A person that does not include the tax in the menu price of the alcoholic beverage product must advise customers on its menu that a fifteen percent (15%) tax on the sale of alcoholic beverages will be added to the final bill.

Commercial airlines, paddlewheel steamboat companies and passenger trains shall, in lieu of taxes levied under subsections (b) and (c), pay annually to the state, for state purposes, a license fee of twelve hundred fifty dollars ($1250). Commercial airlines, paddlewheel steamboat companies and passenger trains which have paid the annual license fee under this section may bring into and store in this state alcoholic beverages on which the Tennessee alcoholic beverage taxes levied under § 57-3-302, have not been paid, but must comply with subdivisions (d)(1) and (2):

Commercial airlines, paddlewheel steamboat companies and passenger trains that bring into, or possess in this state alcoholic beverages on which taxes levied by this state have not been paid are liable for such taxes on the alcoholic beverages;

The liability of commercial airlines, paddlewheel steamboat companies and passenger trains for taxes levied under § 57-3-302, is determined by multiplying the:

Quantity of each type of alcoholic beverage purchased within the operating system of each commercial airline, paddlewheel steamboat company or passenger train by the ratio of its revenue passenger miles in Tennessee to the total revenue passenger miles within its system; and

Respective results obtained under subdivision (d)(2)(A), by the applicable tax rate for each type under § 57-3-302, and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto;

Monthly reports of the liability, determined under subdivision (d)(2), shall be submitted to the department of revenue on forms designated by the commissioner, on or before the last day of each month following the month during which any tax liability arises under this subsection (d). A commercial airline, paddlewheel steamboat company or passenger train that fails to file the report required, or to pay the tax payable under this section in a timely manner as defined by rules and regulations promulgated by the department, is liable for interest and penalties as provided by law; and

This subsection (d) does not apply to commercial airline travel clubs.

No tax authorized or imposed by this section shall be levied or assessed from any charitable, nonprofit, or political organization selling alcoholic beverages at retail pursuant to a special occasion license.

A restaurant, hotel, or caterer licensed under this chapter may obtain a catering license upon the payment of an additional privilege tax in accordance with subdivision (b)(1)(S), for state purposes, to be paid annually.

A special historic district authorized to serve wine under § 57-4-101 shall pay an annual privilege tax of one hundred dollars ($100) for the privilege of serving wine within such district.

Acts 1967, ch. 211, § 3; 1972, ch. 682, § 5; 1972, ch. 756, § 6; 1979, ch. 284, § 1; 1979, ch. 401, § 5; T.C.A., § 57-157; Acts 1980, ch. 898, § 3; 1981, ch. 404, § 5; 1981, ch. 475, § 5; 1983, ch. 52, § 6; 1983, ch. 300, § 5; 1983, ch. 469, § 8; 1984, ch. 975, § 8; 1986, ch. 899, § 9; 1987, ch. 444, §§ 10, 11; 1991, ch. 219, § 2; 1992, ch. 674, § 8; 1998, ch. 795, § 4; 2001, ch. 64, § 3; 2001, ch. 74, § 5; 2001, ch. 84, § 3; 2004, ch. 544, § 3; 2004, ch. 876, §§ 7-10; 2005, ch. 253, § 3; 2009, ch. 168, § 1; 2010, ch. 647, § 3; 2010, ch. 1133, § 4; 2012, ch. 790, §§ 3, 4; 2013, ch. 371, § 2; 2014, ch. 915, § 1; 2017, ch. 338, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1983, ch. 300, § 6 provided that the addition by that act of subdivision (b)(1)(I) shall apply only to counties having a population of 450,000 or greater according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent census.

Acts 2009, ch. 168, § 2 provided that for purposes of §57-4-301, the annual taxes imposed for an historic inn shall be equal to the tax assessed for an historic mansion house site.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Certain 1987 amendments to section inapplicable to certain counties, §57-4-104.

Tennessee wine products exempt, §57-3-207.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 8, 10; 23 Tenn. Juris., Taxation, § 9.

Attorney General Opinions. Distribution of tax proceeds in City of Columbia, OAG 94-72 (6/2/94).

Distribution of tax proceeds in Bedford County, OAG 97-143 (10/23/97).

Licensing and taxation of hotels selling alcohol for consumption on the premises. OAG 16-05, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 3 (2/9/2016).

Licensed distilleries that sell their own alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises, as authorized by T.C.A. §57-3-202(i)(4), must remit the 15% tax imposed on the sales price of each alcoholic beverage sold under T.C.A. §57-4-301(c)(1), because they are exercising the taxable privilege of “engag[ing] in the business of selling at retail in this state alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises.” These distilleries are not, however, required to remit the annual taxes imposed by §57-4-301(b)(1), which are specific to facilities licensed under T.C.A. 57-4-101 et seq. OAG 18-12, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 10 (3/16/2018).

57-4-302. Collection of taxes.

The commissioner of revenue is charged with the responsibility of collecting all taxes set out herein due to the state, and in addition to the requirements set out herein, is authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations as will further implement the full collection of all taxes herein imposed:

Tax Collected from Consumers. The tax hereby imposed shall be collected by the retailer from the consumer insofar as it can be done;

Tax to Be Separately Displayed from List Price. The commissioner may by regulation provide that the amount collected by the retailer from the consumer in reimbursement of the tax be displayed separately from the list price, the price advertised in the premises, the marked price, or other price on the sale check, or other proof of sale;

Bond of Licensee. Every licensee permitted to do business in this state shall, as a condition precedent to the granting of a license, in addition to all other requirements set out herein, post with the commissioner an indemnity bond with good and solvent corporate surety, approved by the commissioner, in an amount equal to four (4) times the average monthly tax liability as determined by the commissioner or in the amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000), whichever is greater, conditioned upon the proper payment of all taxes for which the sale licensee may become liable. If a restaurant is licensed by the commission under § 57-4-101(i), the bond amount imposed shall be one fifth (1/5) the amount specified in this subdivision (3)(A). The forfeiture or cancellation of the bond, for any reason whatsoever, shall automatically revoke the license granted herein. The bond provided for herein shall run for such time as may be determined by the commissioner.

Certificate of Deposit. In lieu of a corporate surety on the bond required by subdivision (3)(A), the commissioner may allow the licensee to secure such bond by depositing collateral in the form of a certificate of deposit, as accepted and authorized by the banking laws of this state, which has a face value equal to the amount of the bond. Such collateral may be deposited with any authorized state depository designated by the commissioner. Interest on any deposited certificate of deposit shall be payable to the licensee who has deposited it as collateral, or to such person as the licensee or the certificate may direct.

Time of Payment. The tax levied hereunder in § 57-4-301(c) shall be due and payable monthly, on the first day of each month, and for the purpose of ascertaining the amount of tax payable under this chapter, it is the duty of all licensees on or before the fifteenth day of each month to transmit to the commissioner, upon forms prescribed, prepared and furnished by the commissioner, returns showing the gross sales, as the case may be, arising from all sales taxable under this chapter during the preceding calendar month;

Tax Transmitted with Return. At the time of transmitting the return required hereunder to the commissioner, the licensee shall remit to the commissioner therewith the amount of tax due under the applicable provisions of this chapter, and failure to so remit such tax shall cause the tax to become delinquent; and

Form of Payment. All taxes, interest and penalties imposed under § 57-4-301(c) shall be paid to the commissioner at Nashville in the form of remittance required by the commissioner.

Acts 1967, ch. 211, § 3; 1973, ch. 68, § 1; 1976, ch. 441, § 1; T.C.A., § 57-158; Acts 1989, ch. 558, § 1; 1992, ch. 982, § 2.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 8, 10; 23 Tenn. Juris., Sretyship, § 5.

Attorney General Opinions. Licensing and taxation of hotels selling alcohol for consumption on the premises. OAG 16-05, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 3 (2/9/2016).

57-4-303. Settlement of tax on quitting business.

If any licensee liable for any tax, interest or penalty levied hereunder shall sell the business or stock of goods, or shall quit the business, the licensee shall make a final return and payment within fifteen (15) days after the date of selling or quitting the business. The successor, successors or assigns, if any, shall withhold sufficient of the purchase money to cover the amount of such taxes, interest and penalties due and unpaid until such former owner shall produce a receipt from the commissioner showing that they have been paid, or a certificate stating that no taxes, interest or penalties are due. If the purchaser of a business or stock of goods shall fail to withhold the purchase money, the purchaser shall be personally liable for the payment of the taxes, interest, and penalties accruing and unpaid on account of the operation of the business by any former owner, owners, or assigns.

Acts 1967, ch. 211, § 3; T.C.A., § 57-159.

Attorney General Opinions. Licensing and taxation of hotels selling alcohol for consumption on the premises. OAG 16-05, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 3 (2/9/2016).

57-4-304. Grace period — Delinquencies and other violations — Penalties.

The commissioner for good cause may extend for not to exceed thirty (30) days the time for making any returns required under this chapter.

When any licensee shall fail to make any return and pay the full amount of the tax as required by this chapter for as many as three (3) times during any one (1) year licensing period, the commission, upon recommendation of the commissioner, may revoke or suspend the license held by such licensee in the same manner and under the same conditions as provided by § 57-4-202.

It is a Class B misdemeanor and punishable as such for any person to engage or continue to engage in business after revocation of the person's license or during any period of suspension of the license as provided hereinabove; and each day business is done in violation hereof shall constitute a separate offense.

In addition, the commissioner or the commissioner's delegate or the commission may file and maintain injunctive proceedings, acting either through the attorney general or the attorney general's delegate or through the legal assistant to the commissioner or the legal assistant to the commissioner's delegate, against any person for the purpose of enjoining the person from doing business as such a licensee during any period of suspension or after revocation of the license. Upon a finding that such person is doing business in violation of the order of revocation or suspension, an injunction shall be issued thereupon. If any person shall refuse to obey or otherwise violate any injunction so issued, or shall break into or enter, or occupy or use, any building or place of business while closed under any injunction so issued, whether preliminary or final, the person is guilty of contempt of court and shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment of not less than thirty (30) days nor more than one (1) year, or by both fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the court.

Acts 1967, ch. 211, § 3; 1970, ch. 398, § 5; 1973, ch. 68, § 2; T.C.A., § 57-160; Acts 1980, ch. 885, § 5; 1985, ch. 76, § 1; 1985, ch. 396, § 6; 1988, ch. 526, § 14; 1989, ch. 591, § 112.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1988, ch. 526, § 45 provided that the amendment by that act shall apply to all assessments of penalty made on or after January 1, 1989.

57-4-305. Notice of licensee's tax delinquency — Response.

In the event any licensee is delinquent in the payment of the tax herein provided for, the commissioner may give notice of the amount of such delinquency by registered mail to all persons, including the commission, having in their possession or under their control any credits or other personal property belonging to such dealer, or owing any debts to such dealer at the time of receipt by them of such notice, and thereafter any person so notified shall neither transfer nor make any other disposition of such credits, other personal property, or debts, until the commissioner shall have consented to a transfer or disposition, or until thirty (30) days shall have elapsed from and after the receipt of such notice. Any notice given to the commission pursuant to this section shall be on paper measuring eight and one-half inches by eleven inches (8½" x 11") and shall contain information on not more than one (1) licensed dealer who is delinquent in the payment or remittance of any tax owing to this state.

All persons so notified must, within five (5) days after receipt of such notice, advise the commission of any and all such credits, other personal property, or debts, in their possession, under their control or owing by them, as the case may be.

Acts 1967, ch. 211, § 3; T.C.A., § 57-161; 1999, ch. 403, § 5.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, §1-3-111.